Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4477.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1170c. (1) By not later than December 31, 2027, the
department, in consultation with water safety experts, shall
develop or adopt, and make available to school districts and public
school academies, a model program of instruction on water safety
for pupils in grades K to 8. The model program of instruction on
water safety must include, at a minimum, all of the following
topics, as appropriate:
(a) The proper use of flotation devices.
(b) Awareness of water conditions.
CRM H01172'25 (H-2) 4mge2y


(c) The proper supervision of swim areas.
(d) Safe behaviors in and around the water.
(e) The importance of pool barriers and fencing.
(f) The importance of water safety and swim skills training.
(g) The importance of avoiding alcohol and substance use with
water recreation.
(h) The importance of cardiopulmonary resuscitation for
drowning victims and the importance of administering
cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
(2) The department, in consultation with water safety experts,
shall review the model program of instruction on water safety under
subsection (1) at least once every year and shall update and revise
the model program of instruction on water safety as needed.
(3) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the board of a
school district or board of directors of a public school academy
shall ensure that each student who is enrolled in grades K to 8 in
the school district or public school academy receives age- and
grade-appropriate instruction on water safety that includes, at a
minimum, the topics described in subsection (1). The water safety
instruction must be provided as part of a physical education
course. Each school district and public school academy may
customize the instruction on water safety based on geographic
characteristics and other special circumstances applicable to the
school district or public school academy.
(4) By not later than July 1, 2027, the department of health
and human services shall develop, and provide to the department, an
informational notice in English, Spanish, and Arabic containing
information and best practices regarding water safety.
(5) The department shall share the informational notice
CRM H01172'25 (H-2) 4mge2y


developed under subsection (4) with all public and nonpublic
schools.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2028, the department of health and human
services shall update annually the informational notice developed
under subsection (4) to account for any change in water safety best
practices. The updated notice must be provided annually to the
department by not later than July 1.
(7) Beginning October 1, 2028, and every October 1 thereafter,
the board of a school district or intermediate school district, the
board of directors of a public school academy, or the governing
body of a nonpublic school shall distribute the informational
notice developed under subsection (4) to the parent or legal
guardian of each student enrolled in the school district,
intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic
school. The informational notice may be distributed electronically
or by mail.
(8) By not later than October 1, 2028, the department shall
post the English, Spanish, and Arabic versions of the informational
notice developed under subsection (4) on the department's website.
(9) By not later than October 1, 2028, the board of a school
district or intermediate school district, the board of directors of
a public school academy, or the governing body of a nonpublic
school shall post links to the department webpages described in
subsection (8) on the website of the school district, public school
academy, or nonpublic school.
(10) The department, the department of health and human
services, a school district, an intermediate school district, a
public school academy, a nonpublic school, and any officers, board
members, or employees of those institutions are immune from civil
CRM H01172'25 (H-2) 4mge2y


liability, both personally and professionally, for any damages
allegedly caused by, arising out of, or relating to the
informational notice developed under subsection (4).
Final Page
CRM H01172'25 (H-2) 4mge2y